Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.09.010

Entity conversion.

(1) A domestic corporation may become an other entity pursuant to a plan of entity conversion if the entity conversion is permitted by the organic law of the other entity by:

(a) Complying with RCW 23B.09.030; and

(b) Filing articles of entity conversion with the secretary of state.

(2) An other entity may become a domestic corporation if the entity conversion is permitted by the organic law of the other entity by:

(a) Complying with the procedures for the approval of an entity conversion provided in the organic law of the other entity; and

(b) Filing articles of entity conversion with the secretary of state.

[ 2014 c 83 s 9.]